Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-512.07
Perpetual care trust fund; violations; penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of sections 12-512.01 to 12-512.08 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1955, c. 18, § 5, p. 93;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 72.